District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.198

Acts not required to be disclosed.

Notwithstanding the possibility that a fact may have a psychological impact on a purchaser, lessee, or sublessee, it shall not be a material fact that must be disclosed in a real estate transaction, nor shall it be the basis for a cause of action against an owner of real property, a real estate broker, a real estate salesperson, a property manager, a lessee, or sublessee, that the following information was not disclosed to the purchaser, lessee, or sublessee:

(1)

An occupant of real property, at any time, was infected or was or is suspected to have been infected with a human immune deficiency virus;

(2)

An occupant of real property, at any time, has been diagnosed, was infected, or was suspected to have been diagnosed as having acquired immune deficiency syndrome or any other disease that has been determined by medical evidence to be highly unlikely to be transmitted through occupancy of property alone; or

(3)

The property, at any time, has been or was suspected to have been the site of a suicide, homicide, or other felony.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.198.